Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-131
Franklin.

The county of Franklin is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range sixteen, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township one, north, of range thirteen, west; thence north to the first standard parallel; thence west to the northwest corner of township four, north, of range sixteen, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 19, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 844;

C.S.1922, § 746;

C.S.1929, § 25-133;

R.S.1943, § 22-131.